Nevada, session 83, AB418.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each board
of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance requiring the
owner or operator of a kennel, an animal rescue organization that
handles pets or a commercial establishment engaged in the
business of handling pets, including, without limitation, a breeder,
a cattery, a retailer, a pet groomer or a dealer, to complete a
training course on handling pets in a manner prescribed by the
board of county commissioners.
2. Each owner or operator who is required to complete a
training course on handling pets pursuant to subsection 1 shall
renew the training biennially in a manner prescribed by the board
of county commissioners.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. The ordinance adopted by a board of county
commissioners pursuant to subsection 1 does not apply to:
(a) A veterinarian;
(b) The staff of a veterinarian who are operating in the office
of and under the supervision of the veterinarian;
(c) An animal shelter; or
(d) A nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to
shelter the pets of victims of domestic violence.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Animal rescue organization” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 574.205.
(b) “Animal shelter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 574.240.
(c) “Breeder” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.245.
(d) “Cattery” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.250.
(e) “Dealer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.260.
(f) “Kennel” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.280.
(g) “Nonprofit organization” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 82A.060.
(h) “Pet” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.300.
(i) “Pet groomer” means a person who professionally styles
pets for compensation. The term includes, without limitation, a
person who professionally bathes, brushes or clips a pet.
(j) “Retailer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.320.
(k) “Veterinarian” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 574.330.
Sec. 2. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each city
council or other governing body of an incorporated city shall
adopt an ordinance requiring the owner or operator of a kennel,
an animal rescue organization that handles pets or a commercial
establishment engaged in the business of handling pets, including,
without limitation, a breeder, a cattery, a retailer, a pet groomer or
a dealer, to complete a training course on handling pets in a
manner prescribed by the city council or other governing body of
the incorporated city.
2. Each owner or operator who is required to complete a
training course on handling pets pursuant to subsection 1 shall
renew the training biennially in a manner prescribed by the city
council or other governing body of the city.
3. The ordinance adopted by a city council or other governing
body of a city pursuant to subsection 1 does not apply to:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) A veterinarian;
(b) The staff of a veterinarian who are operating in the office
of and under the supervision of the veterinarian;
(c) An animal shelter; or
(d) A nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to
shelter the pets of victims of domestic violence.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Animal rescue organization” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 574.205.
(b) “Animal shelter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 574.240.
(c) “Breeder” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.245.
(d) “Cattery” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.250.
(e) “Dealer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.260.
(f) “Kennel” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.280.
(g) “Nonprofit organization” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 82A.060.
(h) “Pet” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.300.
(i) “Pet groomer” means a person who professionally styles
pets for compensation. The term includes, without limitation, a
person who professionally bathes, brushes or clips a pet.
(j) “Retailer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.320.
(k) “Veterinarian” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 574.330.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. This section and section 3 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)